Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202613-2912
Contracts; refinements; changes authorized; applicability.

(1) A design-build contract, construction management at risk contract, or public-private partnership contract may be conditioned upon later refinements in scope and price and may permit the political subdivision in agreement with the design-builder, construction manager, or private partner to make changes in the project without invalidating the contract.

(2) Later refinements under this section shall not exceed the scope of the project statement contained in the request for proposals pursuant to section 13-2907 or 13-2909. This subsection (2) does not apply to public-private partnership contracts.

Laws 2002, LB 391, § 12; R.S.1943, (2003), § 79-2012;

Laws 2008, LB889, § 12;

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 47.
July 18, 2026